Tennessee, session 114, HB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits telecommunication fraud when the person, with intent to
deprive the owner of property, uses a telecommunication device to fraudulently obtain or
exercise control over the property of another without the owner's effective consent.
(b) Telecommunication fraud is punishable as theft pursuant to § 39-14-105, but
in no event shall telecommunication fraud be less than a Class E felony.
(c) As used in this section, "telecommunication device" means the same as
defined in § 39-16-201.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1542
009351
- 1 -